Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Part 1. Receipts from Entities

§ 3351.
Character of receipts.

As used in this section, “entity” means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization in which a trustee has an interest other than a trust or estate to which section 3352 of this title applies, a business or activity to which section 3353 of this title applies, or an asset-backed security to which section 3365 of this title applies.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a trustee shall allocate to income money received from an entity, including reinvested cash dividends.

A trustee shall allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:

property other than money, excluding reinvested cash dividends, provided that if the trustee may elect between money and other property as a distribution, property so elected and distributed shall retain its character as income;

money received in one distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange for part or all of a trust’s interest in the entity;

money received in total or partial liquidation of the entity;

money received from an entity that is a regulated investment company or a real estate investment trust if the money distributed is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes; and

capital gains and capital gains distributions.

Money is received in partial liquidation:

to the extent that the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that it is a distribution in partial liquidation; or

if the total amount of money and property received in a distribution or series of related distributions is greater than 20 percent of the entity’s gross assets, as shown by the entity’s year-end financial statements immediately preceding the initial receipt.

Money is not received in partial liquidation, nor may it be taken into account under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, to the extent that it does not exceed the amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary must pay on taxable income of the entity that distributes the money.

A trustee may rely upon a statement made by an entity about the source or character of a distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by the entity’s board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized to exercise powers to pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a corporation’s board of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Entities to which Section 3351 applies.

The reference to partnerships in subsection 3351(a) is intended to include all forms of partnerships, including limited partnerships, limited liability partnerships, and variants that have slightly different names and characteristics from State to State.
The section does not apply, however, to receipts from an interest in property that a trust owns as a tenant in common with one or more co-owners, nor would it apply to an interest in a joint venture if, under applicable law, the trust’s interest is regarded as that of a tenant in common.

Capital gain dividends.

Under the Internal Revenue Code and the Income Tax Regulations, a “capital gain dividend” from a mutual fund or real estate investment trust is the excess of the fund’s or trust’s net long-term capital gain over its net short-term capital loss.
As a result, a capital gain dividend does not include any net short-term capital gain, and cash received by a trust because of a net short-term capital gain is income under this Act.

Reinvested dividends.

If a trustee elects (or continues an election made by its predecessor) to reinvest dividends in shares of stock of a distributing corporation or fund, whether evidenced by new certificates or entries on the books of the distributing entity, the new shares would be principal.
Making or continuing such an election would be equivalent to deciding under section 3324 to transfer income to principal in order to comply with subsection 3323(b). However, if the trustee makes or continues the election for a reason other than to comply with subsection 3323(b), e.g., to make an investment without incurring brokerage commissions, the trustee should transfer cash from principal to income in an amount equal to the reinvested dividends.

Distribution of property.

The 1962 Act describes a number of types of property that would be principal if distributed by a corporation.
This becomes unwieldy in a section that applies to both corporations and all other entities.
By stating that principal includes the distribution of any property other than money, section 3351 embraces all of the items enumerated in Section 6 of the 1962 Act as well as any other form of nonmonetary distribution not specifically mentioned in that Act.

Partial liquidations.

Under subsection (d)(1), any distribution designated by the entity as a partial liquidating distribution is principal regardless of the percentage of total assets that it represents.
If a distribution exceeds 20% of the entity’s gross assets, the entire distribution is a partial liquidation under subsection (d)(2) whether or not the entity describes it as a partial liquidation.
In determining whether a distribution is greater than 20% of the gross assets, the portion of the distribution that does not exceed the amount of income tax that the trustee or a beneficiary must pay on the entity’s taxable income is ignored.

Other large distributions.

A cash distribution may be quite large (for example, more than 10% but not more than 20% of the entity’s gross assets) and have characteristics that suggest it should be treated as principal rather than income. For example, an entity may have received cash from a source other than the conduct of its normal business operations because it sold an investment asset; or because it sold a business asset other than one held for sale to customers in the normal course of its business and did not replace it; or it borrowed a large sum of money and secured the repayment of the loan with a substantial asset; or a principal source of its cash was from assets such as mineral interests, 90% of which would have been allocated to principal if the trust had owned the assets directly.
In such a case the trustee, after considering the total return from the portfolio as a whole and the income component of that return, may decide to exercise the power under subsection 3324(a) to make an adjustment between income and principal, subject to the limitations in subsection 3324(c).

Vermont Comment

Character of Receipts.

The Vermont Act adds the phrase “including reinvested cash dividends” to subsection 3351(b) in order to make reinvested cash dividends allocated to income, and adds the following language to subsection 3351(c): “excluding reinvested cash dividends, provided that if the trustee may elect between money and other property as a distribution, property so elected and distributed shall retain its character as income.”
The Vermont Act also adds subdivision 3351(c)(5) specifically allocating capital gains and capital gains distributions to principal.

§ 3352.
Distribution from trust or estate.

A trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income from a trust or an estate, in which the trust has an interest other than a purchased interest, and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from such a trust or estate.
If a trustee purchases an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, or a decedent or donor transfers an interest in such a trust to a trustee, section 3351 or 3365 of this title applies to a receipt from the trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Terms of the distributing trust or estate.

Under subsection 3323(a), a trustee is to allocate receipts in accordance with the terms of the recipient trust or, if there is no provision, in accordance with this chapter.
However, in determining whether a distribution from another trust or an estate is income or principal, the trustee should also determine what the terms of the distributing trust or estate say about the distribution; for example, whether they direct that the distribution, even though made from the income of the distributing trust or estate, is to be added to principal of the recipient trust.
Such a provision should override the terms of this chapter, but if the terms of the recipient trust contain a provision requiring such a distribution to be allocated to income, the trustee may have to obtain a judicial resolution of the conflict between the terms of the two documents.

Investment trusts.

An investment entity to which the second sentence of this section applies includes a mutual fund, a common trust fund, a business trust or other entity organized as a trust for the purpose of receiving capital contributed by investors, investing that capital, and managing investment assets, including asset-backed security arrangements to which section 3365 applies.
See John H. Langbein, The Secret Life of the Trust: The Trust as an Instrument of Commerce, 107 Yale L.J. 165 (1997).

§ 3353.
Business and other activities conducted by trustee.

If a trustee who conducts a business or other activity determines that it is in the best interest of all the beneficiaries to account separately for the business or activity instead of accounting for it as part of the trust’s general accounting records, the trustee may maintain separate accounting records for its transactions, whether or not its assets are segregated from other trust assets.

A trustee who accounts separately for a business or other activity may determine the extent to which its net cash receipts must be retained for working capital, the acquisition or replacement of fixed assets, and other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or activity, and the extent to which the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for as principal or income in the trust’s general accounting records. If a trustee sells assets of the business or other activity, other than in the ordinary course of the business or activity, the trustee shall account for the net amount received as principal in the trust’s general accounting records to the extent the trustee determines that the amount received is no longer required in the conduct of the business.

Activities for which a trustee may maintain separate accounting records include:

retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;

farming;

raising and selling livestock and other animals;

management of rental properties;

extraction of minerals and other natural resources;

timber operations; and

activities to which section 3364 of this title applies.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Purpose and scope.

The provisions in section 3353 are intended to give greater flexibility to a trustee who operates a business or other activity in proprietorship form rather than in a wholly-owned corporation (or, where permitted by state law, a single-member limited liability company), and to facilitate the trustee’s ability to decide the extent to which the net receipts from the activity should be allocated to income, just as the board of directors of a corporation owned entirely by the trust would decide the amount of the annual dividend to be paid to the trust.
It permits a trustee to account for farming or livestock operations, rental properties, oil and gas properties, timber operations, and activities in derivatives and options as though they were held by a separate entity.
It is not intended, however, to permit a trustee to account separately for a traditional securities portfolio to avoid the provisions of this Act that apply to such securities.

Section 3353 permits the trustee to account separately for each business or activity for which the trustee determines separate accounting is appropriate.
A trustee with a computerized accounting system may account for these activities in a “subtrust”; an individual trustee may continue to use the business and record-keeping methods employed by the decedent or transferor who may have conducted the business under an assumed name.
The intent of this section is to give the trustee broad authority to select business record-keeping methods that best suit the activity in which the trustee is engaged.

If a fiduciary liquidates a sole proprietorship or other activity to which section 3353 applies, the proceeds would be added to principal, even though derived from the liquidation of accounts receivable, because the proceeds would no longer be needed in the conduct of the business.
If the liquidation occurs during probate or during an income interest’s winding up period, none of the proceeds would be income for purposes of section 3331.

Separate accounts.

A trustee may or may not maintain separate bank accounts for business activities that are accounted for under section 3353.
A professional trustee may decide not to maintain separate bank accounts, but an individual trustee, especially one who has continued a decedent’s business practices, may continue the same banking arrangements that were used during the decedent’s lifetime. In either case, the trustee is authorized to decide to what extent cash is to be retained as part of the business assets and to what extent it is to be transferred to the trust’s general accounts, either as income or principal.